Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.68.070

Misconduct of board—Irregularity material to result.

No irregularity or improper conduct in the proceedings of any county canvassing board or any member of the board amounts to such malconduct as to annul or set aside any election unless the irregularity or improper conduct was such as to either, reverse the outcome of an election measure or procure the person whose right to the office may be contested, to be declared duly elected although the person did not receive the highest number of legal votes.

[ 2016 c 130 s 6; 2011 c 10 s 65; 2003 c 111 s 1707; 1965 c 9 s 29.65.060. Prior: Code 1881 s 3106; 1865 p 43 s 2; RRS s 5367. Formerly RCW 29.65.060.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.